Missouri, session 2026, HB1630.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 329.010 and 329.050, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 329.010, 329.050, and 329.280, to read as
follows:
329.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following words and terms mean:
(1) "Accredited school of cosmetology or school of manicuring", an establishment
operated for the purpose of teaching cosmetology as defined in this section and meeting the
criteria set forth under 34 C.F.R. Part 600, Sections 600.1 and 600.2;
(2) "Apprentice" or "student", a person who is engaged in training within a
cosmetology establishment or school, and while so training performs any of the practices of
the classified occupations within this chapter under the immediate direction and supervision
of a licensed cosmetologist or instructor;
(3) "Board", the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners;
(4) "Cosmetologist", any person who, for compensation, engages in the practice of
cosmetology, as defined in subdivision (5) of this section;
(5) "Cosmetology" includes performing or offering to engage in any acts of the
classified occupations of cosmetology for compensation, which shall include:
(a) "Class CH - hairdresser" includes arranging, dressing, curling, singeing, waving,
permanent waving, cleansing, cutting, bleaching, tinting, coloring or similar work upon the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1630 2
hair of any person by any means; or removing superfluous hair from the body of any person
by means other than electricity, or any other means of arching or tinting eyebrows or tinting
eyelashes. Class CH - hairdresser also includes any person who either with the person's hands
or with mechanical or electrical apparatuses or appliances, or by the use of cosmetic
preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams engages for compensation in any one or
any combination of the following: massaging, cleaning, stimulating, manipulating,
exercising, beautifying or similar work upon the scalp, face, neck, arms or bust;
(b) "Class MO - manicurist" includes cutting, trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting,
cleaning or otherwise beautifying a person's fingernails, applying artificial fingernails,
massaging, cleaning a person's hands and arms; pedicuring, which includes cutting, trimming,
polishing, coloring, tinting, cleaning or otherwise beautifying a person's toenails, applying
artificial toenails, massaging and cleaning a person's legs and feet;
(c) "Class CA - hairdressing and manicuring" includes all practices of cosmetology,
as defined in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subdivision;
(d) "Class E - estheticians" includes the use of mechanical, electrical apparatuses or
appliances, or by the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams, not
to exceed ten percent phenol, engages for compensation, either directly or indirectly, in any
one, or any combination, of the following practices: massaging, cleansing, stimulating,
manipulating, exercising, beautifying or similar work upon the scalp, face, neck, ears, arms,
hands, bust, torso, legs or feet and removing superfluous hair by means other than electric
needle or any other means of arching or tinting eyebrows or tinting eyelashes, of any person;
(e) "Class EA - esthetics and manicuring" includes all practices of cosmetology
as described in paragraphs (b) and (d) of this subdivision; and
(f) "Personal service registration", a registration obtained from the board to
provide services to placebound clients;
(6) "Cosmetology establishment", that part of any building wherein or whereupon any
of the classified occupations are practiced including any space rented within a licensed
establishment by a person licensed under this chapter, for the purpose of rendering
cosmetology services;
(7) "Cross-over license", a license that is issued to any person who has met the
licensure and examination requirements for both barbering and cosmetology;
(8) "Hair braider", any person who, for compensation, engages in the practice of hair
braiding;
(9) "Hair braiding", in accordance with the requirements of section 329.275, the use
of techniques that result in tension on hair strands or roots by twisting, wrapping, waving,
extending, locking, or braiding of the hair by hand or mechanical device, but does not include

HB 1630 3
the application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparations to alter the color of the hair
or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the hair;
(10) "Hairdresser", any person who, for compensation, engages in the practice of
cosmetology as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision (5) of this section;
(11) "Instructor", any person who is licensed to teach cosmetology or any practices of
cosmetology pursuant to this chapter;
(12) "Manicurist", any person who, for compensation, engages in any or all of the
practices in paragraph (b) of subdivision (5) of this section;
(13) "Parental consent", the written informed consent of a minor's parent or legal
guardian that must be obtained prior to providing body waxing on or near the genitalia;
(14) "Placebound client", a client who is ill, disabled, or otherwise unable to
travel to a cosmetology establishment;
(15) "School of cosmetology" or "school of manicuring", an establishment operated
for the purpose of teaching cosmetology as defined in subdivision (5) of this section.
329.050. 1. Applicants for examination or licensure pursuant to this chapter shall
possess the following qualifications:
(1) They shall provide documentation of successful completion of courses approved
by the board, have an education equivalent to the successful completion of the tenth grade,
and be at least seventeen years of age;
(2) If the applicants are apprentices, they shall have served and completed, as an
apprentice under the supervision of a licensed cosmetologist, the time and studies required by
the board which shall be no less than three thousand hours for cosmetologists, and no less
than eight hundred hours for manicurists and no less than fifteen hundred hours for esthetics.
When the classified occupation of manicurist is apprenticed in conjunction with the
classified occupation of esthetician, the apprentice shall be required to successfully
complete an apprenticeship of no less than a total of two thousand three hundred hours.
However, when the classified occupation of manicurist is apprenticed in conjunction with the
classified occupation of cosmetologist, the apprentice shall be required to successfully
complete an apprenticeship of no less than a total of three thousand hours;
(3) If the applicants are students, they shall have had the required time in a licensed
school of no less than one thousand five hundred hours training or the credit hours determined
by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, for the classification of cosmetologist, with the exception of public
vocational technical schools in which a student shall complete no less than one thousand two
hundred twenty hours training. All students shall complete no less than four hundred hours or
the credit hours determined by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title
34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, for the classification of manicurist. All

HB 1630 4
students shall complete no less than seven hundred fifty hours or the credit hours determined
by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, for the classification of esthetician. When the classified
occupation of manicurist is taken in conjunction with the classified occupation of
esthetician, the student shall be required to complete the hours required for both
occupations. However, when the classified occupation of manicurist is taken in conjunction
with the classified occupation of cosmetologist, the student shall not be required to serve the
extra four hundred hours or the credit hours determined by the formula in Subpart A of Part
668 of Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, otherwise
required to include manicuring of nails; and
(4) They shall have passed an examination to the satisfaction of the board.
2. A person may apply to take the examination required by subsection 1 of this
section if the person is a graduate of a school of cosmetology or apprentice program in
another state or territory of the United States which has substantially the same requirements
as an educational establishment licensed pursuant to this chapter. A person may apply to take
the examination required by subsection 1 of this section if the person is a graduate of an
educational establishment in a foreign country that provides training for a classified
occupation of cosmetology, as defined by section 329.010, and has educational requirements
that are substantially the same requirements as an educational establishment licensed under
this chapter. The board has sole discretion to determine the substantial equivalency of such
educational requirements. The board may require that transcripts from foreign schools be
submitted for its review, and the board may require that the applicant provide an approved
English translation of such transcripts.
3. Each application shall contain a statement that, subject to the penalties of making a
false affidavit or declaration, the application is made under oath or affirmation and that its
representations are true and correct to the best knowledge and belief of the person signing the
application.
4. The sufficiency of the qualifications of applicants shall be determined by the board,
but the board may delegate this authority to its executive director subject to such provisions as
the board may adopt.
5. Applications for examination or licensure may be denied if the applicant has
pleaded guilty to, entered a plea of nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the
following offenses or offenses of a similar nature established under the laws of this state, any
other state, the United States, or any other country, notwithstanding whether sentence is
imposed:
(1) Any dangerous felony as defined under section 556.061 or murder in the first
degree;

HB 1630 5
(2) Any of the following sexual offenses: rape in the first degree, forcible rape, rape,
statutory rape in the first degree, statutory rape in the second degree, rape in the second
degree, sexual assault, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, statutory sodomy in the
first degree, statutory sodomy in the second degree, child molestation in the first degree, child
molestation in the second degree, sodomy in the second degree, deviate sexual assault, sexual
misconduct involving a child, sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.090 as
it existed prior to August 28, 2013, sexual abuse under section 566.100 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2013, sexual abuse in the first or second degree, enticement of a child, or
attempting to entice a child;
(3) Any of the following offenses against the family and related offenses: incest,
abandonment of a child in the first degree, abandonment of a child in the second degree,
endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree, abuse of a child, using a child in a
sexual performance, promoting sexual performance by a child, or trafficking in children; and
(4) Any of the following offenses involving child pornography and related offenses:
promoting obscenity in the first degree, promoting obscenity in the second degree when the
penalty is enhanced to a class E felony, promoting child pornography in the first degree,
promoting child pornography in the second degree, possession of child pornography in the
first degree, possession of child pornography in the second degree, furnishing child
pornography to a minor, furnishing pornographic materials to minors, or coercing acceptance
of obscene material.
329.280. 1. Any cosmetologist holding a current and active license to practice
the categories of cosmetology described in paragraphs (a) to (e) of subdivision (5) of
section 329.010 may register with the board for a personal service registration to
provide services to placebound clients outside of a cosmetology establishment. An
applicant for a personal service registration shall submit to the board an application, a
fee as set by the board, and a copy of the applicant's current and active license. An
applicant for a personal service registration may be denied such registration if the
applicant has pled guilty to, entered a plea of nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of
any of the offenses set forth in subsection 5 of section 329.050.
2. A personal service registrant shall keep his or her information that the board
requires in the initial registration current and up to date with the board.
3. A personal service registrant shall provide to the client or customer a copy of
the personal service registration and license upon request.
4. The board may:
(1) Inspect the tools, equipment, and implements of any personal service
registrant one time each year to ensure that the registrant is following all sanitation
standards set by the board by rule;

HB 1630 6
(2) Inspect the tools, equipment, and implements of any personal service
registrant if a customer or client submits a complaint to the board about the registrant;
and
(3) Following all requirements set forth in section 329.140, revoke the personal
service registration of a registrant, discipline a registrant's license, or revoke the
registration and discipline the license of a registrant for any violation set forth in section
329.140 or for failure to follow the requirements of this section.
5. The board may promulgate regulations necessary for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔